src/morphology/stems/subjunctions.lexc
LEXICON Subjunction
dersom subj ; 
å+IM:å # ;
om  subj ;
fordi subj ;
ifall subj ;
som subj ;
dersom subj ;
hvis subj ;
viss subj ;
at subj ;
for conj ;
om p ;
som p ;
derfor adv ;
hvorfor adv ;
hvorvidt subj ;

LEXICON subj
 +CS: # ;
